Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW to read as follows:The commission shall issue a license to practice as an oral preventive assistant to any applicant who:(1) Pays any applicable fees as established by the secretary in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;(2) Submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name, address, and other applicable information as determined by the secretary; and(3) Demonstrates successful completion of oral preventive assistant training approved by the commission with consultation from the dental hygiene examining committee as defined in RCW 18.29.110.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW to read as follows:(1) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the scope of oral preventive assistant services that may be performed by oral preventive assistants under the supervision of a licensed dentist.(2) The scope of oral preventive assistant services that the commission identifies in subsection (1) of this section must include:(a) Dental assisting services that a dental assistant may perform under the supervision of a licensed dentist;(b) Periodontal probing after initial probing by a dentist or dental hygienist and diagnosis by a dentist; and(c) Dental prophylaxis for patients in a healthy oral state as defined by the commission with consultation from the dental hygiene examining committee as defined in RCW 18.29.110.(3) A dentist may not assign an oral preventive assistant to perform services until the oral preventive assistant has demonstrated skills necessary to competently perform all assigned duties and responsibilities.Sec. 3. RCW 18.260.040 and 2023 c 460 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the scope of dental assisting services related to patient care and laboratory duties that may be performed by dental assistants.(b) In addition to the services and duties authorized by the rules adopted under (a) of this subsection, a dental assistant may apply topical anesthetic agents.(c) All dental services performed by dental assistants under (a) or (b) of this subsection must be performed under the close supervision of a supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist as the dentist or dental therapist may allow, except for the procedures involving sterilization of dental instruments or equipment, which may be performed under general supervision.(2) In addition to any other limitations established by the commission, dental assistants may not perform the following procedures:(a) Any scaling procedure;(b) Any oral prophylaxis, except coronal polishing;(c) Administration of any general or local anesthetic, including intravenous sedation;(d) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the oral cavity;(e) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human teeth, jaw, or adjacent structures; and(f) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis, other than impressions allowed as a delegated duty for dental assistants pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.(3) A dentist or dental therapist may not assign a dental assistant to perform duties until the dental assistant has demonstrated skills necessary to perform competently all assigned duties and responsibilities.Sec. 4. RCW 18.260.090 and 2007 c 269 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The commission shall issue an initial credential or renewal credential to an applicant who has met the requirements for a credential or deny an initial credential or renewal credential based upon failure to meet the requirements for a credential or unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by chapter 18.130 RCW.(2) The commission may adopt rules for renewal requirements for a credential, including continuing education requirements, for oral preventive assistants and expanded function dental auxiliary licenses.--- END ---